Arkansas, session 2025, HB1115.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES. There is hereby established for the
Department of Commerce - Arkansas Rehabilitation Services for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U012U REHABILITATION SERVICES COMMISSIONER 1 GRADE SE01
(2) L013N GENERAL PHYSICIAN 2 GRADE MP06
(3) L021N PHYSICAL THERAPIST 1 GRADE MP03
(4) L003C PSYCHOLOGIST 2 GRADE MP03
(5) L022N OCCUPATIONAL THERAPIST 3 GRADE MP02
*MAH013*
01/07/2025 2:07:02 PM MAH013

HB1115
(6) L032C REGISTERED NURSE - HOSPITAL 2 GRADE MP01
(7) D006N STATE SYSTEMS ARCHITECT 1 GRADE IT10
(8) D022N IT SENIOR PROJECT MANAGER 2 GRADE IT09
(9) D012C DATABASE SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT08
(10) D028C SENIOR SOFTWARE SUPPORT SPECIALIST 3 GRADE IT07
(11) D038C SENIOR SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 2 GRADE IT06
(12) D022C SYSTEMS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT06
(13) D063C COMPUTER SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT05
(14) D052C SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE IT05
(15) D064C WEBSITE DEVELOPER 1 GRADE IT04
(16) N172N ACOM REHAB OPERATIONS DIRECTOR 3 GRADE GS13
(17) G004C MANAGING ATTORNEY 1 GRADE GS13
(18) P078C ACOM ARS DIRECTOR OF COMMUNICATIONS 1 GRADE GS12
(19) A014C FISCAL DIVISION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS12
(20) R006C HUMAN RESOURCES ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS12
(21) A027C ACCOUNTING OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(22) E005C ACOM REHAB DIR OF VOCATIONAL TRAIN 1 GRADE GS10
(23) G040C ACOM REHAB DIRECTOR - SPECIAL PROGR 4 GRADE GS10
(24) A052C ACCOUNTING COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS09
(25) G070C ACOM DIRECTOR OF FIELD OPERATIONS 1 GRADE GS09
(26) L037C ACOM REHAB AREA MANAGER 13 GRADE GS09
(27) E011C ACOM VOCATIONAL EDUCATION COORD 4 GRADE GS09
(28) M009C LICENSED CERTIFIED SOCIAL WORKER 3 GRADE GS09
(29) L033C PSYCHOLOGICAL EXAMINER 8 GRADE GS09
(30) X038C QUALITY ASSURANCE MANAGER 3 GRADE GS09
(31) L098C CERTIFIED VOCATIONAL REHAB COUNSELOR 95 GRADE GS08
(32) S004C MAINTENANCE MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(33) V007C PROCUREMENT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(34) X062C QUALITY ASSURANCE COORDINATOR 4 GRADE GS08
(35) G121C REHAB PROGRAM MANAGER 8 GRADE GS08
(36) A060C SENIOR AUDITOR 1 GRADE GS08
(37) E023C TRAINING PROJECT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(38) G163C ACOM REHAB PROGRAM COORDINATOR 9 GRADE GS07
(39) L057C ACOM REHAB SVS FACILITY SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS07
(40) M032C ACOM VOCATIONAL REHAB PLACEMENT SPEC 14 GRADE GS07
(41) R024C ASSISTANT PERSONNEL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS07
01/07/2025 2:07:02 PM MAH013

HB1115
(42) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS07
(43) G147C GRANTS COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS07
(44) S017C MAINTENANCE COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(45) A065C PAYROLL SERVICES COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(46) E040C STAFF DEVELOPMENT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(47) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 6 GRADE GS06
(48) G172C CAREER PLANNING & PLAC COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS06
(49) E043C CERTIFIED VOCATIONAL TEACHER 7 GRADE GS06
(50) G214C GRANTS SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS06
(51) R025C HUMAN RESOURCES ANALYST 2 GRADE GS06
(52) M050C INTERPRETER 4 GRADE GS06
(53) S033C MAINTENANCE SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS06
(54) P031C MEDIA SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(55) P027C PUBLIC INFORMATION SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(56) T062C PUBLIC SAFETY DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS06
(57) B076C RESEARCH PROJECT ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(58) S022C SKILLED TRADES SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS06
(59) C036C ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW ANALYST 2 GRADE GS05
(60) C022C BUSINESS OPERATIONS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
(61) V014C BUYER 2 GRADE GS05
(62) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 5 GRADE GS05
(63) C054C LOCAL OFFICE ADMINISTRATIVE SPEC 4 GRADE GS05
(64) V018C WAREHOUSE MANAGER 1 GRADE GS05
(65) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 15 GRADE GS04
(66) V020C INVENTORY CONTROL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS04
(67) V022C PURCHASING TECHNICIAN 1 GRADE GS04
(68) C043C RECORDS MANAGEMENT ANALYST 2 GRADE GS04
(69) S099C STATIONARY ENGINEER 1 GRADE GS04
(70) V023C STOREROOM SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS04
(71) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 64 GRADE GS03
(72) S056C FOOD PREPARATION SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS03
(73) M081C RESIDENTIAL CARE SHIFT SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS03
(74) C087C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST I 4 GRADE GS02
(75) S068C FOOD PREPARATION COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS02
(76) M076C RECREATIONAL ACTIVITY LEADER II 1 GRADE GS02
(77) M083C RESIDENTIAL CARE TECHNICIAN 2 GRADE GS02
01/07/2025 2:07:02 PM MAH013

HB1115
(78) S087C INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES ASSISTANT 1 GRADE GS01
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 352

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP. There is hereby authorized, for the Department
of Commerce - Arkansas Rehabilitation Services for the 2025-2026 fiscal year,
the following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known
as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes:
nineteen (19) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay
not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation
Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the paying account as
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services,
operating expenses, and grants and aid by the Department of Commerce -
Arkansas Rehabilitation Services - Operations for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $16,426,131
(02) EXTRA HELP 252,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 6,374,281
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 7,401,096
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 175,000
(C) PROF. FEES 844,903
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) CONTRACT SERVICES 30,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $61,473,411

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - INCREASING CAPABILITIES ACCESS NETWORK -
FEDERAL. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be
payable from the paying account as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of
01/07/2025 2:07:02 PM MAH013

HB1115
Commerce - Arkansas Rehabilitation Services - Increasing Capabilities Access
Network - Federal for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $200,707
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 77,783
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 400,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 20,402
(C) PROF. FEES 20,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 100,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $818,892

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - STATEWIDE DISABILITY TELECOMMUNICATIONS
EQUIPMENT PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of
Commerce, to be payable from the Telecommunications Equipment Fund, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Commerce -
Arkansas Rehabilitation Services - Statewide Disability Telecommunications
Equipment Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $173,203
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 71,465
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 80,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 7,000
(C) PROF. FEES 5,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) ASSISTIVE EQUIPMENT PURCHASE GRANTS 310,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $646,668

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - PEOPLE WITH DISABILITIES PROGRAM - SPECIAL.
01/07/2025 2:07:02 PM MAH013

HB1115
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable
from the Governor's Commission on People with Disabilities Fund, for
operating expenses of the Department of Commerce - Arkansas Rehabilitation
Services - People with Disabilities Program - Special for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $30,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $30,000

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - TECHNOLOGY EQUIPMENT REVOLVING LOAN PROGRAM.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable
from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for providing loans to individuals with
disabilities for essential assistive technology, adaptive equipment, and for
loan administration/servicing by the Department of Commerce - Arkansas
Rehabilitation Services - Technology Equipment Revolving Loan Program for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) LOANS $750,000

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - CASH OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the cash fund
deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, for operating expenses of the Department of Commerce - Arkansas
Rehabilitation Services - Cash Operations for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

01/07/2025 2:07:02 PM MAH013

HB1115
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $356,542
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $356,542

SECTION 9. REGULAR SALARIES - DIVISION OF STATE SERVICES FOR THE BLIND
- OPERATIONS. There is hereby established for the Department of Commerce -
Arkansas Rehabilitation Services - Division of State Services for the Blind
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular
employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N125N ACOM DSB DEP DIR SVCS FOR THE BLIND 1 GRADE GS15
(2) G021C ACOM DSB ASSISTANT DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS11
(3) G303C ACOM DSB PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR 2 GRADE GS09
(4) L037C ACOM REHAB AREA MANAGER 3 GRADE GS09
(5) X038C QUALITY ASSURANCE MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(6) L098C CERTIFIED VOCATIONAL REHAB COUNSELOR 23 GRADE GS08
(7) E026C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(8) X062C QUALITY ASSURANCE COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS08
(9) G121C REHAB PROGRAM MANAGER 4 GRADE GS08
(10) E023C TRAINING PROJECT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(11) G163C ACOM REHAB PROGRAM COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS07
(12) M032C ACOM VOCATIONAL REHAB PLACEMENT SPEC 1 GRADE GS07
(13) E040C STAFF DEVELOPMENT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(14) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 6 GRADE GS06
(15) A074C FISCAL SUPPORT SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS06
(16) L051C REHABILITATION COUNSELOR 2 GRADE GS06
01/07/2025 2:07:02 PM MAH013

HB1115
(17) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 3 GRADE GS05
(18) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 8 GRADE GS04
(19) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS04
(20) C043C RECORDS MANAGEMENT ANALYST 1 GRADE GS04
(21) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 11 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 76

SECTION 10. EXTRA HELP - DIVISION OF STATE SERVICES FOR THE BLIND -
OPERATION. There is hereby authorized, for the Department of Commerce -
Arkansas Rehabilitation Services - Division of State Services for the Blind
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or
temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds
appropriated herein for such purposes: thirty (30) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act
for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - STATE SERVICES FOR THE BLIND - OPERATIONS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable
from the paying account as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of
Commerce - Arkansas Rehabilitation Services - Division of State Services for
the Blind for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $3,496,655
(02) EXTRA HELP 384,174
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 1,418,651
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,222,186
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 155,000
(C) PROF. FEES 195,259
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 100,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $6,971,925
01/07/2025 2:07:02 PM MAH013

HB1115

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION - BLIND SERVICES GRANTS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the paying
account as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for grants
and aid and purchase of services of the Department of Commerce - Arkansas
Rehabilitation Services - Blind Services Grants for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) GRANTS AND AID/PURCHASE OF SERVICES $6,000,000

SECTION 13. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 14. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 15. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
01/07/2025 2:07:02 PM MAH013

HB1115
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.






























01/07/2025 2:07:02 PM MAH013